Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.04.090

Application of general provisions of the code.

The provisions of chapters 9A.04 through 9A.28 RCW of this title are applicable to offenses defined by this title or another statute, unless this title or such other statute specifically provides otherwise.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.04.090.]